sl-SI: Vrsta priključka zaganjalnika: Ploščati priključek (blade); Viličasti priključek (spade); Navojni zatič; Drugo
pl: Typ zacisku rozrusznika: Złącze nożowe; Złącze widełkowe; Złącze śrubowe; Inne
el: Τύπος ακροδέκτη εκκινητή: Ακροδέκτης τύπου λεπίδας (Blade terminal); Ακροδέκτης τύπου δίχαλου (Spade terminal); Μπουζόνι (Stud); Άλλο
hu: Indítócsatlakozó típusa: Késes csatlakozó; Villás csatlakozó; Tőcsavaros; Egyéb
zh-CN: 起动机端子类型: 插片端子; 铲形端子; 螺柱; 其他
vi: Loại đầu nối củ đề: Đầu cốt lưỡi dao; Đầu cốt chữ U; Đinh tán; Khác
ro-RO: Tip de terminal al electromotorului: Bornă tip lamelă; Bornă tip papuc; Știft; Altele
ru: Тип клеммы стартера: Ножевая клемма; Вилочная клемма; Шпилька; Другое
tr: Marş terminal tipi: Bıçak terminal; Çatal terminal; Saplama; Diğer
hr-HR: Vrsta priključka startera: Plosnati priključak; Viličasti priključak; Navojni zatik; Ostalo
lt-LT: Starterio terminalo tipas: Plokščiasis kontaktas; Šakutės formos antgalis; Smeigė; Kita
it: Tipo di terminale Starter: Terminale a lama; Terminale a forcella; Terminale a perno; Altro
da: Terminaltype for starter: Fladstik; Spadestik; Pindbolt; Andet
en: Starter terminal type: Blade terminal; Spade terminal; Stud; Other
th: ประเภทขั้วต่อสตาร์ทเตอร์: หางปลาแบบเสียบ; หางปลาแบบก้ามปู; สตัด; อื่นๆ
ja: スターター端末タイプ: ブレード端子; スペード端子; スタッド; その他
pt-BR: Tipo do terminal de ignição: Terminal tipo lâmina; Terminal tipo forquilha; Pino prisioneiro; Outro
ko: 스타터 단자 유형: 블레이드 터미널; 스페이드 터미널; 스터드; 기타
nl: Type startmotor-aansluiting: Vlaksteker; Kabelschoen; Tapeind; Overige
sv: Typ av startterminal: Flatstift; Gaffelkabelsko; Bultanslutning; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ svorky štartéra: Nožový konektor; Vidlicový konektor; Svorník; Iné
cs: Typ svorky startéru: Nožový konektor; Vidlicový konektor; Svorník; Jiné
es: Tipo de terminal del motor de arranque: Terminal de cuchilla; Terminal de horquilla; Perno; Otro
bg-BG: Тип клема на стартера: Плоска клема; Кабелна обувка; Шпилка; Друго
fi: Käynnistimen liittimen tyyppi: Lattaliitin; Haarukkaliitin; Pulttiliitin; Muu
zh-TW: 啟動器端子類型: 刀片端子; 鏟型端子; 螺柱; 其他
fr: Type de borne de démarrage: Borne à lame; Borne à fourche; Goujon; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de terminal do motor de arranque: Terminal de lâmina; Terminal de forquilha; Perno; Outro
nb: Terminaltype i startmotor: Flatstift; Spadeterminal; Gjengetapp; Annet
de: Art des Anlasseranschlusses: Flachstecker; Kabelschuh (Gabel); Bolzen; Sonstige